public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.dic
akuar/A
realdir/A
amar/A
reanemar/A
arđentar/A
armiđar/A
inasprir/A
aŧionar/A
inaxenir/A
badanar/A
xbaɉar/A
trabalar/A
xbalinar/A
inbalŧar/A
arbandonar/A
barar/A
barbotar/A
xbaroŧar/A
bastonar/A
batocar/A
inbavar/A
befar/A
xbeletar/A
bertonar/A
xbevakiar/A
xbiankiđar/A
binar/A
biondiđar/A
bituar/A
dexbocar/A
soboɉir/A
xbokonar/A
xbolsegar/A
inbonbaxar/A
bordar/A
bortir/A
dexbotonar/A
dexboxemar/A
xbragesar/A
sbrankar/A
inbraŧolar/A
brigar/A
xbrodegar/A
inbrokar/A
xbronkolar/A
bruskiar/A
bufonar/A
inbustar/A
inbuxerar/A
incapetar/A
incavar/A
ascèñer/A
aparcéñer/A
incetar/A
cinconar/A
copar/A
redar/A
indebitar/A
xdentegar/A
déver/A
dindolar/A
maledíxer/A
doler/A
domestegar/A
stradopiar/A
indosar/A
redreŧar/A
kondúxer/A
inđaltronar/A
malđontar/A
rinđovenar/A
èrđer/A
emular/A
dexeredar/A
eterniđar/A
exímer/A
kontrafar/A
desfabrikar/A
sfaldar/A
falŧidiar/A
desfantar/A
infastidir/A
favelar/A
skarnifegar/A
sofegar/A
fénder/A
aferir/A
sferdir/A
infetar/A
desfiamar/A
sfiapir/A
sfidar/A
defilar/A
afinar/A
fiolar/A
prefisar/A
desfitar/A
sfodegar/A
sfogonar/A
foleđar/A
straforar/A
reformar/A
desfornir/A
refosar/A
frankar/A
sfrapuñar/A
fratonar/A
sfredir/A
fríđer/A
frodar/A
sfruñar/A
fulmenar/A
sfumegar/A
fuŧilar/A
dexgaɉar/A
galonar/A
inganbarar/A
xgañolir/A
ingarbujar/A
garxar/A
ingaxetar/A
gloriar/A
xgomentar/A
dexgorgar/A
dexgradar/A
dexgranar/A
ingranfir/A
dexgrasar/A
dexagravar/A
xgremir/A
dexgreŧiar/A
ingriñolir/A
ingrixolir/A
xgrosar/A
inguantar/A
guarantir/A
guidar/A
xgusar/A
ilkamar/A
indulxentar/A
iniŧiar/A
rinproverar/A
reintegrar/A
intrivelar/A
introitar/A
joŧolar/A
xɉavetar/A
xɉinŧar/A
ɉubilar/A
deskàder/A
kagar/A
skaldar/A
kalkañar/A
kalpestar/A
kaminar/A
inkanalar/A
inkanelar/A
skanpar/A
inkantexemar/A
inkapar/A
kapitolar/A
skapuŧar/A
kareŧar/A
deskarnaŧar/A
kartar/A
deskartoŧar/A
rekaskar/A
katarar/A
kativar/A
prokaŧar/A
skavar/A
kavilar/A
inkietar/A
deskodegar/A
kojonbarar/A
inkokonar/A
kolorar/A
inkoltrinar/A
eskomiar/A
skonbàter/A
skonfuxionar/A
konpañar/A
konseliar/A
skontentar/A
skonŧar/A
kopiar/A
skórer/A
deskonkordar/A
kordonar/A
skoroŧar/A
skosar/A
deskoŧar/A
skovolar/A
krepar/A
kriar/A
skrokar/A
krostenar/A
kruŧiar/A
kuaɉar/A
inkuerar/A
kufar/A
inkukar/A
kuniar/A
prokurar/A
inkuŧolar/A
xlanegar/A
lanpar/A
lardar/A
dexlatar/A
xlavakiar/A
relèđer/A
lemoxinar/A
levar/A
xlexerir/A
xlipegar/A
delimar/A
xlisar/A
xlofar/A
dexloɉar/A
loŧar/A
dexlubiar/A
perlustrar/A
inmacar/A
xmagonar/A
malgamar/A
manaŧar/A
manestrar/A
manteđar/A
mañetiđar/A
markiar/A
xmaronar/A
masakrar/A
xmatar/A
medegar/A
malmenar/A
inxmerdar/A
malméter/A
xmilŧir/A
mobiliar/A
molestar/A
dexmontegar/A
xmorgar/A
moxegar/A
inmufir/A
permutar/A
malnàser/A
xnegriđar/A
nolar/A
nuvolir/A
ociđar/A
oltrigar/A
opiniar/A
ornar/A
pacar/A
paisar/A
paliđar/A
konpaneđar/A
desparir/A
inparonir/A
repasar/A
patir/A
inpaurir/A
inpegolar/A
spenar/A
inpenolar/A
perdonar/A
inpestar/A
despetorar/A
spianar/A
inpiegar/A
piolar/A
inpironar/A
pixolar/A
despolpar/A
deskonpóner/A
ponpar/A
strapónxer/A
spòrxer/A
poxar/A
inprestar/A
procesar/A
despuleđar/A
puŧar/A
dexraixar/A
ranpiñar/A
raxar/A
relaŧionar/A
ribelar/A
derivar/A
irokar/A
roñar/A
ruđenir/A
ruŧar/A
saketar/A
salpar/A
saonar/A
scafeđar/A
sedolar/A
insèguer/A
inselar/A
disentir/A
seraɉar/A
sfisiar/A
desimilar/A
sitonar/A
skarabotar/A
inskeletrar/A
skoređar/A
soraskríver/A
desolar/A
rasomeɉar/A
sorsar/A
spàrxer/A
inspesar/A
inspinar/A
respónder/A
movestar/A
stangar/A
predestenar/A
kostituir/A
storpiar/A
konstrénđer/A
ostruir/A
destuđar/A
sugar/A
resusitar/A
retaɉar/A
tanbarar/A
tardigar/A
tavaneđar/A
inténder/A
tenporiđar/A
inkonteñir/A
téñer/A
teraŧar/A
tibiar/A
intixikir/A
toniđar/A
tornir/A
dexintosegar/A
trakanar/A
trasinar/A
trebiar/A
trigar/A
stronkar/A
turbinar/A
ŧekatređar/A
ŧercar/A
ŧexelar/A
antiŧipar/A
inŧotar/A
urtar/A
vageđar/A
vantaxar/A
prevéder/A
invelenir/A
venturar/A
arvèñer/A
xverđelar/A
traversar/A
travestir/A
xvimenar/A
viŧinar/A
revokar/A
volturar/A
inxaltrar/A
xbringar/A
inxeregar/A
xmarir/A
xufolar/A
